Utah statutes.
26-8a-507.   Cease and desist orders.
The department may issue a cease and desist order to any person who:
(1)  may be disciplined under Section 26-8a-503 or 26-8a-504; or
(2)  otherwise violates this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter.
